Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB954.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5(a) of the act of October 9, 2008 (P.L.1511, No.124), known as the Diesel-Powered Motor Vehicle Idling Act, is amended to read:Section 5. Penalties.(a) Fines.--The driver or owner of a diesel-powered motor vehicle with a gross weight of 10,001 pounds or more, engaged in commerce [or the owner or operator of a location where such vehicles load, unload or park], that violates the provisions of this act commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $150 and not more than $300 and court costs.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516171819